Mississippi, session 2026, HB844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-7-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-7-19.  (1)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, all licenses shall be renewed biennially under the fee schedule in Section 73-7-29.  Applications for renewal of licenses for cosmetologists, barbers, estheticians, nail technicians and instructors must be accompanied by the required renewal fee.  A grace period of sixty (60) days will be given in which to renew the license.  Upon the expiration of the grace period of sixty (60) days, any applicant for the renewal of a license will be required to pay the required renewal fee and a delinquent fee in addition to the renewal fee.  The fees may be paid according to the manner prescribed by the board in rules and regulations.  Checks returned to the board because of insufficient funds shall result in nonrenewal of the license, which will require the penalty fee for insufficient fund checks plus all other amounts due for renewal of the license before the license may be renewed.  After one (1) year has passed from the expiration date of the license, a delinquent fee must be paid for each year up to three (3) years, after which the required examination must be taken before a license can be renewed.  However, any cosmetologist, barber, esthetician, nail technician or instructor who has at least ten (10) years' experience under their license and whose license has been expired for not more than five (5) years shall not have to take the examination in order to renew their license, but shall renew their license upon payment of the required renewal fee, any adjudicated fines, and a delinquent fee for each year that their license has been expired.  All applications for the examination required by this chapter shall expire ninety (90) days from the date thereof. (2)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. (3)  No license issued by the board may be renewed until all monetary fines and penalties assessed by the board to the licensee are paid in full. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.